Arkansas, session 2025, SB566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Temporary Language.
The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer on his or her
books and those of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State the sum of
two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) from the General Revenue
Allotment Reserve Fund to a cash fund as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State for the Department of Corrections to provide funds to be
used for:
(1) Construction and expansion of new and existing correctional
facilities;
(2) Construction and expansion of a new or existing correctional
facility designated as a mental health facility; and
(3) Grants to counties for:
(A) Construction-related costs for county jail
improvements, county jail expansion, and new county jail construction-related
*CEB260*
03/25/2025 12:43:52 PM CEB260

SB566
expenses; and
(B) Payment of the principal on a county jail.


































03/25/2025 12:43:52 PM CEB260